Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF446.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 2139YH (3) 91 jda/jh H.F. 446 Section 1. Section 282.18, subsection 17, Code 2025, is 1 amended by striking the subsection. 2 Sec. 2. APPLICABILITY. This Act applies to applications 3 and notifications related to open enrollment submitted under 4 section 282.18 on or after the effective date of this Act. 5